root/usr/share/postgresql/8.4/tsearch_data/czech.affix
#SET ISO8859-2
#TRY aáeéěiíoóuúůyýbcčdďlmnňfjkprřsštťvghqwx

prefixes

flag N:
   .    > NE

flag E:
   .    > NEJ

flag W:
   .    > NE
   .    > NEJ
   .    > NEJNE

flag F:
   .    > JEDNA
   .    > DVAA
   .    > TřIA
   .    > čTYřIA
   .    > čTYRYA
   .    > PěTA
   .    > šESTA
   .    > SEDMA
   .    > OSMA
   .    > DEVěTA

suffixes

flag *P:
   [^AEOKL]    > A
   [^AEOKLU]    > U
   [^AEOKL]    > OVI
   [^AEOKLURCGH]    > E
   [AEIOUYáéíóúůýě]R    > E
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúůýě]R    > -R,řE
   [^AEOKL]    > EM
   [^AEOKL]    > ů
   [^AEOKL]    > ůM
   [^AEOKL]    > Y
   [^AEOKLGHU]    > ECH
   G    > -G,ZíCH
   [^C]H    > -H,ZíCH
   CH    > -CH,šíCH
   U    > íCH
   [^Eě]K    > A
   [^Eě]K    > U
   [^Eě]K    > OVI
   [^Eě]K    > EM
   [^Eě]K    > ů
   [^Eě]K    > ůM
   [^Eě]K    > -K,CíCH
   [^Eě]K    > Y
   EK    > -EK,KA
   EK    > -EK,KU
   EK    > -EK,KOVI
   EK    > -EK,KEM
   EK    > -EK,Ků
   EK    > -EK,KůM
   EK    > -EK,CíCH
   EK    > -EK,KY
   [^DTN]ěK    > A
   [^DTN]ěK    > U
   [^DTN]ěK    > OVI
   [^DTN]ěK    > EM
   [^DTN]ěK    > Ků
   [^DTN]ěK    > KůM
   [^DTN]ěK    > CíCH
   [^DTN]ěK    > KY
   DěK    > -DěK,ďKA
   DěK    > -DěK,ďKU
   DěK    > -DěK,ďKOVI
   DěK    > -DěK,ďKEM
   DěK    > -DěK,ďKů
   DěK    > -DěK,ďKůM
   DěK    > -DěK,ďCíCH
   DěK    > -DěK,ďKY
   NěK    > -NěK,ňKA
   NěK    > -NěK,ňKU
   NěK    > -NěK,ňKOVI
   NěK    > -NěK,ňKEM
   NěK    > -NěK,ňKů
   NěK    > -NěK,ňKůM
   NěK    > -NěK,ňCíCH
   NěK    > -NěK,ňKY
   TěK    > -TěK,ťKA
   TěK    > -TěK,ťKU
   TěK    > -TěK,ťKOVI
   TěK    > -TěK,ťKEM
   TěK    > -TěK,ťKů
   TěK    > -TěK,ťKůM
   TěK    > -TěK,ťCíCH
   TěK    > -TěK,ťKY
   [BDTšžIOU]EL    > A
   [BDTšžIOU]EL    > U
   [BDTšžIOU]EL    > OVI
   [BDTšžIOU]EL    > E
   [BDTšžIOU]EL    > EM
   [BDTšžIOU]EL    > ů
   [BDTšžIOU]EL    > ůM
   [BDTšžIOU]EL    > Y
   [BDTšžIOU]EL    > ECH
   [^BDTšžIOU]EL    > -EL,LA
   [^BDTšžIOU]EL    > -EL,LU
   [^BDTšžIOU]EL    > -EL,LOVI
   [^BDTšžIOU]EL    > -EL,LE
   [^BDTšžIOU]EL    > -EL,LI
   [^BDTšžIOU]EL    > -EL,LEM
   [^BDTšžIOU]EL    > -EL,Lů
   [^BDTšžIOU]EL    > -EL,LůM
   [^BDTšžIOU]EL    > -EL,LY
   [^BDTšžIOU]EL    > -EL,LECH
   [^E]L    > A
   [^E]L    > U
   [^E]L    > OVI
   [^E]L    > E
   [^E]L    > EM
   [^E]L    > ů
   [^E]L    > ůM
   [^E]L    > Y
   [^E]L    > ECH
   O    > -O,A
   O    > -O,U
   O    > -O,OVI
   O    > -O,EM
   O    > -O,ů
   O    > -O,ůM
   O    > -O,Y
   [^GK]O    > -O,ECH
   [GK]O    > -O,áCH
   [^CčďIJňřšťž]A    > -A,Y
   [CčIJřšž]A    > -A,I
   ďA    > -ďA,DI
   ňA    > -ňA,NI
   ťA    > -ťA,TI
   A    > -A,OVI
   A    > -A,U
   A    > -A,O
   A    > -A,OU
   A    > -A,ů
   A    > -A,ůM
   [^Kďňť]A    > -A,ECH
   KA    > -KA,CíCH
   ďA    > -ďA,DěCH
   ňA    > -ňA,NěCH
   ťA    > -ťA,TěCH
   E    > -E,A
   E    > -E,U
   E    > -E,OVI
   E    > M
   E    > -E,ů
   E    > -E,ůM
   E    > -E,Y
   E    > CH

flag *I:
   ď    > -ď,DI
   ň    > -ň,NI
   ť    > -ť,TI
   [^C]H    > -H,ZI
   CH    > -CH,šI
   R    > -R,řI
   [BDFMNPTVWCčJřSšZž]    > I
   O    > -O,I
   [^BDTšžIOU]EL    > -EL,LI
   [BDTšžIOU]EL    > I
   [^E]L    > I
   [^Eě]K    > -K,CI
   EK    > -EK,CI
   DěK    > -DěK,ďCI
   NěK    > -NěK,ňCI
   TěK    > -TěK,ťCI
   RE    > -RE,řI
   A    > -A,I

flag *V:
   [^AEKLOň]    > OVé
   A    > -A,OVé
   E    > -E,OVé
   [^AEIOUYáéíóúýě][^BDAEIOUYáéíóúýě]EL    > OVé
   [AEIOUYáéíóúýě][^BDAEIOUYáéíóúýě]EL    > -EL,LOVé
   [BDAEIOUYáéíóúýě]EL    > OVé
   [^E]L    > OVé
   [^DTN]ěK    > OVé
   O    > Vé
   [^Eě]K    > OVé
   EK    > -EK,KOVé
   LEň    > OVé
   [^L]Eň    > -Eň,ňOVé
   [^E]ň    > OVé

flag *U:
   EC    > -EC,CE
   EC    > -EC,CI
   EC    > -EC,čE
   EC    > -EC,CEM
   EC    > -EC,Ců
   EC    > -EC,CůM
   EC    > -EC,CíCH
   [^E]C    > E
   [^E]C    > I
   [^E]C    > EM
   [^E]C    > ů
   [^E]C    > ůM
   [^E]C    > íCH
   [^ACďEňť]    > E
   [^ACďEňťI]    > I
   [^ACďEňť]    > OVI
   [^ACďEňť]    > EM
   [^ACEň]    > ů
   [^ACEň]    > ůM
   [^ACďEňťSX]    > íCH
   [SX]    > ECH
   X    > Y
   A    > -A,E
   A    > -A,OVI
   A    > -A,EM
   A    > -A,OVé
   A    > -A,ů
   A    > -A,ůM
   A    > -A,I
   A    > -A,íCH
   ď    > -ď,Dě
   ď    > -ď,DI
   ď    > -ď,DěM
   ď    > -ď,DíCH
   LEň    > -ň,Ně
   LEň    > -ň,NI
   LEň    > -ň,NěM
   LEň    > ů
   LEň    > ůM
   LEň    > -ň,NíCH
   [^L]Eň    > -Eň,Ně
   [^L]Eň    > -Eň,NI
   [^L]Eň    > -Eň,NěM
   [^L]Eň    > -Eň,ňů
   [^L]Eň    > -Eň,ňůM
   [^L]Eň    > -Eň,NíCH
   [^E]ň    > -ň,Ně
   [^E]ň    > -ň,NI
   [^E]ň    > -ň,NěM
   [^E]ň    > ů
   [^E]ň    > ůM
   [^E]ň    > -ň,NíCH
   ť    > -ť,Tě
   ť    > -ť,TI
   ť    > -ť,TěM
   ť    > -ť,TíCH
   E    > -E,I
   E    > M
   E    > -E,ů
   E    > -E,ůM
   E    > -E,íCH

flag *D:
   ES    > -ES,A
   ES    > -ES,U
   ES    > -ES,OVI
   [^GHK]ES    > -ES,E
   ES    > -ES,EM
   ES    > -ES,OVé
   ES    > -ES,ů
   ES    > -ES,ůM
   [^IGHK]ES    > -ES,ECH
   [^I]ES    > -ES,Y
   IES    > -ES,íCH
   KES    > -ES,áCH
   IES    > -ES,I
   OS    > -OS,A
   OS    > -OS,U
   OS    > -OS,OVI
   [^GHK]OS    > -OS,E
   OS    > -OS,EM
   OS    > -OS,OVé
   OS    > -OS,ů
   OS    > -OS,ůM
   [^IGHK]OS    > -US,ECH
   [^I]OS    > -US,Y
   IOS    > -OS,íCH
   KOS    > -OS,áCH
   IOS    > -OS,I
   US    > -US,A
   US    > -US,U
   US    > -US,OVI
   [^GHK]US    > -US,E
   US    > -US,EM
   US    > -US,OVé
   US    > -US,ů
   US    > -US,ůM
   [^EIK]US    > -US,ECH
   [^EI]US    > -US,Y
   [EI]US    > -US,íCH
   KUS    > -US,áCH
   [EI]US    > -US,I
   [^EOU]S    > é
   [^ASY]    > é
   A    > -A,é
   [čDNTV]KY    > -KY,EK
   [^čDNTV]KY    > -Y,ů
   ANY    > -NY,N
   [^KN]Y    > -Y,ů
   [čDNTV]KY    > -Y,áM
   [^čDNTV]KY    > -Y,ůM
   [^K]Y    > -Y,ůM
   [GH]Y    > -Y,áCH
   [čDNTV]KY    > -Y,áCH
   [^čDNTV]KY    > -KY,CíCH
   [^GHK]Y    > -Y,ECH
   [SZ]Y    > -Y,íCH
   [čDNTV]KY    > -Y,AMI

flag *H:
   [^EY]    > U
   [^EYGHKC]    > E
   [^EY]    > EM
   [^EY]    > Y
   [^EY]    > ů
   [^EY]    > ůM
   [^EYGHK]    > ECH
   G    > -G,ZíCH
   [^C]H    > -H,ZíCH
   CH    > -CH,šíCH
   K    > -K,CíCH
   E    > -E,U
   E    > M
   E    > -E,Y
   E    > -E,ů
   E    > -E,ůM
   E    > -E,ECH
   Y    > -Y,ů
   Y    > -Y,ůM
   [^GHK]Y    > -Y,ECH
   GY    > -GY,ZíCH
   [^C]HY    > -HY,ZíCH
   CHY    > -CHY,šíCH
   KY    > -KY,CíCH

flag *L:
   [^NK]    > A
   [^NK]    > U
   [^KN]    > E
   YK    > -K,CE
   [BDFMPTVW]    > ě
   [^NK]    > EM
   [^NK]    > Y
   [^NK]    > ů
   [^NK]    > ůM
   [BDFLMPRTVZ]    > ECH
   [GH]    > áCH
   G    > -G,ZíCH
   [^C]H    > -H,ZíCH
   CH    > -CH,šíCH
   [CčJřSšž]    > íCH
   EK    > -EK,KA
   EK    > -EK,KU
   EK    > -EK,KEM
   EK    > -EK,KY
   EK    > -EK,Ků
   EK    > -EK,KůM
   EK    > -EK,CíCH
   íčEK    > -EK,KáCH
   [^E]K    > A
   [^E]K    > U
   [^E]K    > EM
   [^E]K    > Y
   [^E]K    > ů
   [^E]K    > ůM
   [^E]K    > -K,CíCH
   MEN    > A
   MEN    > U
   MEN    > E
   MEN    > EM
   MEN    > Y
   MEN    > ů
   MEN    > ůM
   MEN    > ECH
   [^M]EN    > -EN,NA
   [^M]EN    > -EN,NU
   [^M]EN    > -EN,NE
   [^M]EN    > -EN,NEM
   [^M]EN    > -EN,NY
   [^M]EN    > -EN,Nů
   [^M]EN    > -EN,NůM
   [^M]EN    > -EN,NECH
   [^E]N    > A
   [^E]N    > U
   [^E]N    > E
   [áéíý]N    > ě
   [^E]N    > EM
   [^E]N    > Y
   [^E]N    > ů
   [^E]N    > ůM
   [^E]N    > ECH
