root/usr/share/postgresql/8.4/tsearch_data/czech.dict
alergen/H
anarchokomunista/PDI
android/PI
aperitiv/H
arciopat/PIV
Aristoteles/D
Artur/PV
Augustýn/PV
autopotah/H
bájnější/YE
bandoneonista/PD
Barmánec/U
Bařinka/PV
běhoun/H
Belgičan/PDI
Berlín/L
Betlacha/PV
bezbrannější/YRE
bezhlavější/YRE
bezohlednější/YRE
bezprecedentnější/YRE
bezúhonnější/YRE
bezvýznamnější/YRE
biometeorolog/PV
blankvers/H
blíže/E
bohapustší/YRW
Bojanov/L
Bój/UV
bonsajista/PD
branibor/PIV
brouk/PI
Brumov/L
Bubeník/PV
buchar/H
Bůžek/PV
bytelnější/YRE
cenzurovávat/JTN
cihlář/U
coul/H
cvičnější/YRE
cyklotrialista/PD
Částkov/L
Čechoslovák/PI
Čepelka/PV
červ/PI
čtyrycetitisícovka/ZQF
čtyrycítka/ZQF
čtyřicatery/F
čtyřicátník/PIF
čtyřicet/FI
čtyřicetiletý/FYR
čtyřicetitisícovka/ZQF
čtyřicítka/ZQF
debl/H
Dejl/PV
Děkov/L
déle/E
delegát/PI
děrovač/SU
dětinštější/YRW
devadesátery/F
devadesát/FI
devadesátiletý/FYR
devadesátitisícovka/ZQF
devadesátkrát/F
diurnista/PD
dlužnější/YRE
Dočkal/PV
dodávání/SN
doktor/PI
dorazítkovat/ATN
dospanější/YRW
Drápal/PV
Drážov/L
drén/H
dřevorubec/U
dvacatero/F
dvacaterý/FY
dvacet/FI
dvacetiletý/FYR
dvacetitisícovka/ZQF
dvacítka/ZQF
dvouroček/PIV
eisenašský/YKRN
ekofeminista/PD
emancipovanější/YRE
Emanuel/PV
encyklopedista/PD
etylalkohol/H
existencialističtější/YRW
exorcista/PD
exportér/PI
Filička/PV
florbalista/PD
folklorista/PD
Franc/UV
fušer/PIV
galvanometr/H
garant/PI
Guadeloupan/PD
Gubáš/UV
gubernátor/PI
Haspr/PV
házeč/U
Hazlov/L
hejsek/PIV
hezoun/PIV
historiograf/PV
hlavičkovější/YRW
hod/H
hornatější/YRE
Hornolužičan/PDI
Hostějov/L
Houda/PV
hranostaj/UV
huhlání/SN
hulvát/PI
Huml/PV
Hylák/PV
Chomutov/L
chudinštější/YRE
individualističtější/YRW
indosament/H
indosant/PI
infanterista/PD
Íránec/U
Ivanov/PV
Jeroným/PV
Jeruzalém/L
jonák/PI
jurista/PD
kačer/PI
Kalač/UV
Karaexport/H
Kaznějov/L
Kelt/PI
Kertész/PV
Klepal/PV
klimatizovat/ATN
kokršpaněl/PD
kolosálnější/YRW
komisionář/U
komparativ/H
komunard/PI
kopista/PD
Kosík/PV
kostelík/L
kozoroh/PI
krmič/U
krotčejší/YE
Krumlov/L
Kubala/PV
Kulhánek/PV
kursor/H
Kypřan/PDI
Kytín/L
lapiduch/PIV
laskavější/YRW
Lebiš/UV
lemovaný/YKRN
Lenárt/PV
Lipov/L
Lothar/PV
Lučan/PDI
luštitel/UD
majitel/UD
makadam/H
Málkov/L
maňásek/PIV
materialističtější/YRE
mečoun/PI
Mejstřík/PV
metropolita/PD
Michalovič/UV
Mikota/PV
Milíčov/L
militantnější/YRW
minigolf/H
moralizátor/PI
morganista/PD
mrtvější/YRE
nacentrovávat/JTN
Nadějov/L
nadhaněč/U
nahnilejší/YRW
náměstek/PIV
napsal/ON
Navara/PV
názor/H
neduživější/YRE
negativista/PD
nenasytnější/YRW
Nepraš/UV
neurotičtější/YRE
niť/ZI
nudista/PD
oběd/L
oblácení/SN
obvázanější/YRE
odečitatelnější/YRW
odchovanec/U
odlévaný/YKRN
oficír/PI
ohřívanější/YRW
ochotnický/YRN
okřín/H
Oliva/PV
optimista/PD
osmdesátery/F
osmdesátiletý/FYR
osmdesátkrát/F
oštěpař/U
otřelejší/YRW
ovád/PI
ovládnutelný/YKRN
ovsíček/L
padesátery/F
padesátiletý/FYR
padesátkrát/F
padlejší/YRE
Pajer/PV
pascalista/PD
patriarchát/H
patriot/PI
pekelník/PI
Pelnář/UV
Pištěk/PV
Pludek/PV
Pňov/L
pobožnůstkář/U
pocitovější/YRW
podejmout/IN
podmazat/ATN
podrobnější/YRE
podtyp/H
poetista/PD
polozakrytější/YRW
popuzování/SN
pošetilec/U
pověřovatel/UD
povznesenější/YRW
prapraděd/PI
predekrement/H
prodanější/YN
prodávanější/YE
progresista/PD
pronárod/L
propitější/YRW
prošukání/SN
provazochodec/U
prvomanžel/PD
předběhovější/YRE
předehřátější/YRW
přechylovávaný/YKRN
přesčas/H
přesložitější/YRW
přetřást/IN
převěšení/SN
přitakávač/U
přivézt/ATN
přivlečenější/YRW
pucflek/PIV
Račín/L
radiotelegrafista/PD
redaktor/PI
rekurs/H
relativnější/YRE
Rostov/L
rošťák/PI
rovnostář/U
rozepsanější/YRW
rozhekaný/YKRN
rozmnožitel/UD
roztahovanější/YRW
rozváži/BN
Různar/PV
Ryška/PV
Samec/UV
samet/H
Savín/L
sedmdesátery/F
sedmdesátiletý/FYR
sedmdesátkrát/F
sepjatější/YRE
sestavenější/YRW
sinicový/YRN
skladník/PI
skladovatel/UD
slavíček/PIV
slepec/U
Sloup/PV
Smržov/L
sněm/H
současnější/YRW
spodnější/YRE
spoluzakladatel/UD
stabilitní/YKRN
stehlíček/PI
Stropešín/L
subjektivista/PD
subtropičtější/YRW
sulfid/H
sumátor/PI
svazarmovec/U
svrchnější/YRE
Šádek/PV
Šachov/L
šedesátery/F
šedesátiletý/FYR
šedesátkrát/F
šibeničník/PI
Štilc/UV
Švajcr/PV
Švihov/L
tádžický/YRN
talián/HPI
těsnější/YRW
továrník/PI
Trhoň/UV
trinitron/H
trockista/PD
trojúhelník/HL
truchlivější/YRE
třicatery/F
třicet/FI
třicetitisícovka/ZQF
Tulach/PV
turek/PIV
úkolovávání/SN
úlisnější/YRW
únor/L
úpravář/U
uvážlivější/YRW
uzávěrový/YKRN
vadnější/YRE
vavřín/H
Velichov/L
Verner/PV
viklefista/PD
Vincent/PI
Vízek/PV
Vršovec/U
vrtčejší/YRW
všednější/YRE
vybájit/ATN
výletník/PI
vyloupávaný/YKRN
vyložitelnější/YRW
výmaz/H
vyšperkovávat/JTN
vyvýšenější/YRW
vzestupnější/YRE
zadudání/SN
zákoník/HPIV
zaplatitelný/YKRN
zavést/IN
zavináč/US
Zavlekov/L
závodničtější/YRW
zbankrotování/SN
zmar/H
zmínění/SN
znamenitější/YRE
zůstavitel/UD
žáček/PIV
žíhanější/YRW
